District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.08

Confirmed order.

Confirmation of a registered order, whether by operation of law or after notice and hearing, precludes further contest of the order with respect to any matter that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 608, 42 DCR 6748

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-346.8.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 608 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).